Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201190-517
State aid for community college areas.

(1) Notwithstanding the Community College Foundation and Equalization
Aid Act or any other provision of law, state aid for each community college
area for fiscal year 2010-11 shall equal:

(a) For the Central Community College Area, $8,289,499;

(b) For the Metropolitan Community College Area, $18,389,499;

(c) For the Mid-Plains Community College Area, $8,251,373;

(d) For the Northeast Community College Area, $12,784,454, including
$38,815 for Nebraska Indian Community College and $13,120 for Little Priest
Tribal College;

(e) For the Southeast Community College Area, $27,133,220; and

(f) For the Western Community College Area, $11,909,980.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, state aid for each community college area for fiscal
years 2011-12 and 2012-13 shall equal the amount of state aid appropriated
by the Legislature for the respective fiscal year multiplied by the following
percentage for each community college area:

(a) For the Central Community College Area, eight
and eighty-six hundredths percent;

(b) For the Metropolitan Community College Area, twenty-six
and fifty-one hundredths percent;

(c) For the Mid-Plains Community College Area, nine
and five-hundredths percent;

(d) For the Northeast Community College Area, fourteen
and four-hundredths percent. Of such amount provided for the Northeast Community
College Area, one-tenth of one percent shall be provided for Nebraska Indian
Community College and two-tenths of one percent for Little Priest Tribal College;

(e) For the Southeast
Community College Area, twenty-eight and twenty-seven hundredths percent;
and

(f)
For the Western Community College Area, thirteen and twenty-seven hundredths
percent.

(3) The Department of Administrative
Services shall distribute the amounts provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section for the respective fiscal year to
each community college area in ten as nearly as possible equal monthly payments
between the fifth and the twentieth day of each month beginning in September of each year.

Laws 2010, LB1072, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB59, § 8.
February 23, 2011
Community College Foundation and Equalization Aid Act, see section 85-2201.